Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.233

Merger or consolidation of domestic and foreign corporation—Participation in an exchange.

One or more foreign corporations and one or more domestic corporations may be merged or consolidated or participate in an exchange in the following manner, if such merger, consolidation, or exchange is permitted by the laws of the state under which each such foreign corporation is organized:

(1) Each domestic corporation shall comply with the provisions of this title with respect to the merger, consolidation, or exchange, as the case may be, of domestic corporations and each foreign corporation shall comply with the applicable provisions of the laws of the state under which it is organized.

(2) If the surviving or new corporation in a merger or consolidation is to be governed by the laws of any state other than this state, it shall comply with the provisions of this title and Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW with respect to foreign corporations if it is to transact business in this state, and in every case it shall file with the secretary of state of this state:

(a) An agreement that it may be served with process in accordance with RCW 23.95.450 in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic corporation which is a party to such merger or consolidation and in any proceeding for the enforcement of the rights, if any, of a dissenting shareholder of any such domestic corporation against the surviving or new corporation; and

(b) An agreement that it will promptly pay to the dissenting shareholders of any such domestic corporation the amount, if any, to which they shall be entitled under the provisions of this title with respect to the rights of dissenting shareholders.

The effect of such merger or consolidation shall be the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of domestic corporations, if the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the laws of this state. If the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the laws of any state other than this state, the effect of such merger or consolidation shall be the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of domestic corporations except insofar as the laws of such other state provide otherwise.

(3) At any time prior to the effective date of the articles of merger, consolidation, or exchange, the merger, consolidation, or exchange, may be abandoned pursuant to provision therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger, consolidation or exchange. In the event the merger, consolidation, or exchange is abandoned, the parties thereto shall execute a notice of abandonment signed by an officer for each corporation signing the notice and deliver the notice to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4114; 1982 c 35 s 136.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.